Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-1410.01
Training academies; de-escalation training.

As part of entry-level law enforcement certification, each training academy shall require completion of de-escalation training. The de-escalation training shall include training related to mental health behaviors, substance abuse, anti-bias, implicit bias, and communicating with a person in a crisis.

Laws 2021, LB51, § 7.